Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 70A.205.405 and 2025 c 417 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is levied a $5 per tire fee on the retail sale of new replacement vehicle tires. The fee imposed in this section must be paid by the buyer to the seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full amount of the fee. The fee collected from the buyer by the seller less the ((ten percent)) amount retained by the seller as provided in RCW 70A.205.430(1) must be paid to the department of revenue in accordance with RCW 82.32.045.(2) The department of revenue shall incorporate into the agency's regular audit cycle a reconciliation of the number of tires sold and the amount of revenue collected by the businesses selling new replacement vehicle tires at retail. The department of revenue shall collect on the business excise tax return from the businesses selling new replacement vehicle tires at retail:(a) The number of tires sold; and(b) The fee levied in this section.(3) All other applicable provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full force and application with respect to the fee imposed under this section. The department of revenue shall administer this section.(4) For the purposes of this section, "new replacement vehicle tires" means tires that are newly manufactured for vehicle purposes and does not include retreaded vehicle tires.Sec. 2. RCW 82.04.050 and 2025 c 422 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who:(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the regular course of business without intervening use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property without intervening use by such person; or(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065; or(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty without intervening use by such person.(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection following such use.(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1) (a), (b), and (((g)))(f), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals, birds and insects;(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original owner;(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term "janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery. The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering, repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same. For the purposes of this section, it is presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging offered regularly for public occupancy for periods of less than a month constitutes a license to use or enjoy the property subject to sales and use tax and not a rental or lease of property;(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital goods for consumers;(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be construed to modify this subsection.(3) ((The))Except as provided in subsection (17) of this section, the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other service emoluments however designated, received by persons engaging in the following business activities:(a) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;(b) Credit bureau services;(c) Automobile parking and storage garage services;(d) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an electric utility;(e) Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events;(f) The following personal services: Tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services;(g)(i) Information technology training services, technical support, and other services including, but not limited to, assisting with network operations and support, help desk services, in-person training related to hardware or software, network system support services, data entry services, and data processing services;(ii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(g), "data processing service" has the same meaning as in subsection (6)(b)(ii)(B) of this section. Data processing does not include the service described in subsection (6)(b)(ii)(A) of this section;(h) Custom website development services. For the purposes of this subsection (3), "website development services" means the design, development, and support of a website provided by a website developer to a customer;(i) Investigation services, security services, security monitoring services, and armored car services including, but not limited to, background checks, security guard and patrol services, personal and event security, armored car transportation of cash and valuables, and security system services and monitoring. This does not include locksmith services. For the purposes of this subsection (3)(i), "investigation services" means providing investigation, detective, and personal background check services including private detective services, background check services, fingerprint services, bounty hunting services, private investigation services, lie detection and polygraph services, missing person tracing services, and skip tracing services;(j) ((Temporary))(i) Except as provided in (j)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection (3), temporary staffing services. ((For the purposes of this subsection (3), "temporary staffing services" means providing workers to other businesses, except for hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 or 71.12 RCW, for limited periods of time to supplement their workforce and fill employment vacancies on a contract or for fee basis))(ii) Temporary staffing services do not include staffing services provided to hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 or 71.12 RCW, for limited periods of time to supplement their workforce and fill employment vacancies on a contract or for a fee basis.(iii) Temporary staffing services also do not include paymaster services to the extent amounts received from such services are deductible under RCW 82.04.43393.(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(j):(A) "Temporary staffing services" has the same meaning as "staffing service" in RCW 82.04.540, which does not include services merely rendered by an independent contractor unless the services rendered by the independent contractor meet the definition of "staffing service."(B) "Paymaster services" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.43393;(k) Advertising services. (i) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "advertising services" means all digital and nondigital services related to the creation, preparation, production, or dissemination of advertisements including, but not limited to:(A) Layout, art direction, graphic design, mechanical preparation, production supervision, placement, referrals, acquisition of advertising space, and rendering advice concerning the best methods of advertising products or services; and(B) Online referrals, search engine marketing, ((and)) lead generation optimization, web campaign planning, the acquisition of advertising space in the internet media, and the monitoring and evaluation of website traffic for purposes of determining the effectiveness of an advertising campaign.(ii) "Advertising services" do not include:(A) Web hosting services and domain name registration;(B) Services rendered in respect to the following:(I) "Newspapers" as defined in RCW 82.04.214;(II) Printing or publishing under RCW 82.04.280; and(III) "Radio and television broadcasting" within this state as defined in RCW 82.04.281; and(C) Services rendered in respect to out-of-home advertising, including: Billboard advertising; street furniture advertising; transit advertising; place-based advertising, such as in-store display advertising or point-of-sale advertising; dynamic or static signage at live events; naming rights; and fixed signage advertising. Out-of-home advertising does not include direct mail.(iii) In the event a person is unable to source advertising services in accordance with RCW 82.32.730 to the local level due to a lack of information, the person must source the services statewide in a manner prescribed by the department;(l)(i) Live presentations including, but not limited to, lectures, seminars, workshops, or courses where participants attend either in-person or via the internet or telecommunications equipment that allows audience members and the presenter or instructor to give, receive, and discuss information with each other in real time.(ii) "Live presentations" do not include:(A) Classes provided by preschools;(B) Classes provided by elementary schools, secondary schools, and institutions of higher education as part of their accreditation;(C) Musical, dramatic, comedic, or similar performances;(D) One-on-one instructional activities including tutoring, consulting, and music lessons;(E) Presentations given at the physical location of a facility exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.020(2). For the purposes of this subsection (3)(l)(ii)(E):(I) Presentations where participants may join via internet or telecommunications equipment are given at the physical location of the presenter during the real-time presentation; and(II) Presentations where all participants, other than the presenter, attend at the physical location of a facility exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.020(2) are given at the physical location of the participants regardless of the location of the presenter at the time of the presentation; and(F) Youth camps; and(m)(i) Operating an athletic or fitness facility, including all charges for the use of such a facility or for any associated services and amenities, except as provided in (m)(ii) of this subsection.(ii) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in (m)(i) of this subsection (3), the term "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this subsection does not include:(A) Separately stated charges for the use of an athletic or fitness facility where such use is primarily for a purpose other than engaging in or receiving instruction in a physical fitness activity;(B) Separately stated charges for the use of a discrete portion of an athletic or fitness facility, other than a pool, where such discrete portion of the facility does not by itself meet the definition of "athletic or fitness facility" in this subsection;(C) Separately stated charges for services, such as massage, nutritional consulting, and body composition testing, that do not require the customer to engage in physical fitness activities to receive the service. The exclusion in this subsection (3)(m)(ii)(C) does not apply to personal training services and instruction in a physical fitness activity;(D) Separately stated charges for physical therapy provided by a physical therapist, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.74.010, or occupational therapy provided by an occupational therapy practitioner, as those terms are defined in RCW 18.59.020, when performed pursuant to a referral from an authorized health care practitioner or in consultation with an authorized health care practitioner. For the purposes of this subsection (3)(m)(ii)(D), an authorized health care practitioner means a health care practitioner licensed under chapter 18.83, 18.25, 18.36A, 18.57, 18.71, or 18.71A RCW, or, until July 1, 2022, chapter 18.57A RCW;(E) Rent or association fees charged by a landlord or residential association to a tenant or residential owner with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the landlord or residential association, unless the rent or fee varies depending on whether the tenant or owner has access to the facility;(F) Services provided in the regular course of employment by an employee with access to an athletic or fitness facility maintained by the employer for use without charge by its employees or their family members;(G) The provision of access to an athletic or fitness facility by an educational institution to its students and staff. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the public for the use of any of the educational institution's athletic or fitness facilities are a retail sale under this subsection (3)(m). For purposes of this subsection (3)(m)(ii)(G), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;(H) Yoga, chi gong, or martial arts classes, training, or events held at a community center, park, school gymnasium, college or university, hospital or other medical facility, private residence, or any other facility that is not operated within and as part of an athletic or fitness facility.(iii) Nothing in (m)(ii) of this subsection (3) may be construed to affect the taxation of sales made by the operator of an athletic or fitness facility, where such sales are defined as a retail sale under any provision of this section other than this subsection (3).(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(m), the following definitions apply:(A) "Athletic or fitness facility" means an indoor or outdoor facility or portion of a facility that is primarily used for: Exercise classes; strength and conditioning programs; personal training services; tennis, racquetball, handball, squash, or pickleball; or other activities requiring the use of exercise or strength training equipment, such as treadmills, elliptical machines, stair climbers, stationary cycles, rowing machines, pilates equipment, balls, climbing ropes, jump ropes, and weightlifting equipment.(B) "Martial arts" means any of the various systems of training for physical combat or self-defense. "Martial arts" includes, but is not limited to, karate, kung fu, tae kwon do, Krav Maga, boxing, kickboxing, jujitsu, shootfighting, wrestling, aikido, judo, hapkido, Kendo, tai chi, and mixed martial arts.(C) "Physical fitness activities" means activities that involve physical exertion for the purpose of improving or maintaining the general fitness, strength, flexibility, conditioning, or health of the participant. "Physical fitness activities" includes participating in yoga, chi gong, or martial arts.((For the purposes of (g) through (i) and (k) of this subsection (3), the terms "sale at retail" and "retail sale" do not include a sale between members of an affiliated group as defined in RCW 82.04.299(1)(f).))(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible personal property to consumers.(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of sublease or subrent.(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.(6)(a) ((The term))Except as provided in subsection (17) of this section, the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" also includes the sale of prewritten computer software, custom software, and customization of prewritten computer software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the sale of prewritten computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use. There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by the vendor or by the purchaser.(b)(i) ((The term))Except as provided in subsection (17) of this section, the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" also includes the charge made to consumers for the right to access and use prewritten computer software, custom software, and customization of prewritten computer software, where possession of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party, regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.(ii)(A) The service described in (b)(i) of this subsection (6) includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software, custom software, and customization of prewritten computer software to perform data processing.(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(b)(ii), "data processing" means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities.(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection, "extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property, labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.(8)(a) ((The))Except as provided in subsection (17) of this section, the term also includes the following sales to consumers of digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.(c) ((A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services does not include the following services if the sale occurs between members of an affiliated group as defined in RCW 82.04.299(1)(f):(i) Any service that primarily involves the application of human effort by the seller, and the human effort originated after the customer requested the service;(ii) Live presentations, such as lectures, seminars, workshops, or courses, where participants are connected to other participants via the internet or telecommunications equipment, which allows audience members and the presenter or instructor to give, receive, and discuss information with each other in real time;(iii) Advertising services. For purposes of this subsection (8)(c), "advertising services" means all services directly related to the creation, preparation, production, or dissemination of advertisements. Advertising services include layout, art direction, graphic design, mechanical preparation, production supervision, placement, and rendering advice to a client concerning the best methods of advertising that client's products or services. Advertising services also include online referrals, search engine marketing and lead generation optimization, web campaign planning, the acquisition of advertising space in the internet media, and the monitoring and evaluation of website traffic for purposes of determining the effectiveness of an advertising campaign. Advertising services do not include web hosting services and domain name registration; and(iv) Data processing services. For purposes of this subsection (8)(c), "data processing service" means a primarily automated service provided to a business or other organization where the primary object of the service is the systematic performance of operations by the service provider on data supplied in whole or in part by the customer to extract the required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to usable information. Data processing services include check processing, image processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing, claim processing, and similar activities. Data processing does not include the service described in subsection (6)(b) of this section.(d))) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the occurrence of a condition subsequent.(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind.(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; (c) farmers for the purpose of providing bee pollination services; and (d) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and development.(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a "sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.(15)(a) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes amounts charged, however labeled, to consumers to engage in any of the activities listed in this subsection (15)(a), including the furnishing of any associated equipment or, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, providing instruction in such activities, where such charges are not otherwise defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" in this section:(i)(A) Golf, including any variant in which either golf balls or golf clubs are used, such as miniature golf, hitting golf balls at a driving range, and golf simulators, and including fees charged by a golf course to a player for using his or her own cart. However, charges for golf instruction are not a retail sale, provided that if the instruction involves the use of a golfing facility that would otherwise require the payment of a fee, such as green fees or driving range fees, such fees, including the applicable retail sales tax, must be separately identified and charged by the golfing facility operator to the instructor or the person receiving the instruction.(B) Notwithstanding (a)(i)(A) of this subsection (15) and except as otherwise provided in this subsection (15)(a)(i)(B), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include amounts charged to participate in, or conduct, a golf tournament or other competitive event. However, amounts paid by event participants to the golf facility operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the golf facility are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(i), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;(ii) Ballooning, hang gliding, indoor or outdoor sky diving, paragliding, parasailing, and similar activities;(iii) Air hockey, billiards, pool, foosball, darts, shuffleboard, ping pong, and similar games;(iv) Access to amusement park, theme park, and water park facilities, including but not limited to charges for admission and locker or cabana rentals. Discrete charges for rides or other attractions or entertainment that are in addition to the charge for admission are not a retail sale under this subsection (15)(a)(iv). For the purposes of this subsection, an amusement park or theme park is a location that provides permanently affixed amusement rides, games, and other entertainment, but does not include parks or zoos for which the primary purpose is the exhibition of wildlife, or fairs, carnivals, and festivals as defined in (b)(i) of this subsection;(v) Batting cage activities;(vi) Bowling, but not including competitive events, except that amounts paid by the event participants to the bowling alley operator are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi). Likewise, amounts paid by the event organizer to the operator of the bowling alley are retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(vi), if such amounts vary based on the number of event participants;(vii) Climbing on artificial climbing structures, whether indoors or outdoors;(viii) Day trips for sightseeing purposes;(ix) Bungee jumping, zip lining, and riding inside a ball, whether inflatable or otherwise;(x) Horseback riding offered to the public, where the seller furnishes the horse to the buyer and providing instruction is not the primary focus of the activity, including guided rides, but not including therapeutic horseback riding provided by an instructor certified by a nonprofit organization that offers national or international certification for therapeutic riding instructors;(xi) Fishing, including providing access to private fishing areas and charter or guided fishing, except that fishing contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;(xii) Guided hunting and hunting at game farms and shooting preserves, except that hunting contests and license fees imposed by a government entity are not a retail sale under this subsection;(xiii) Swimming, but only in respect to (A) recreational or fitness swimming that is open to the public, such as open swim, lap swimming, and special events like kids night out and pool parties during open swim time, and (B) pool parties for private events, such as birthdays, family gatherings, and employee outings. Fees for swimming lessons, to participate in swim meets and other competitions, or to join a swim team, club, or aquatic facility are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xiii);(xiv) Go-karting, bumper cars, and other motorized activities where the seller provides the vehicle and the premises where the buyer will operate the vehicle;(xv) Indoor or outdoor playground activities, such as inflatable bounce structures and other inflatables; mazes; trampolines; slides; ball pits; games of tag, including laser tag and soft-dart tag; and human gyroscope rides, regardless of whether such activities occur at the seller's place of business, but not including playground activities provided for children by a licensed child day care center or licensed family day care provider as those terms are defined in RCW 43.216.010;(xvi) Shooting sports and activities, such as target shooting, skeet, trap, sporting clays, "5" stand, and archery, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in these activities, but not including fees to enter a competitive event, instruction that is entirely or predominately classroom based, or to join or renew a membership at a club, range, or other facility;(xvii) Paintball and airsoft activities;(xviii) Skating, including ice skating, roller skating, and inline skating, but only in respect to discrete charges to members of the public to engage in skating activities, but not including skating lessons, competitive events, team activities, or fees to join or renew a membership at a skating facility, club, or other organization;(xix) Nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as downhill and cross-country skiing, snowboarding, ski jumping, sledding, snow tubing, snowshoeing, and similar snow sports and activities, whether engaged in outdoors or in an indoor facility with or without snow, but only in respect to discrete charges to the public for the use of land or facilities to engage in nonmotorized snow sports and activities, such as fees, however labeled, for the use of ski lifts and tows and daily or season passes for access to trails or other areas where nonmotorized snow sports and activities are conducted. However, fees for the following are not retail sales under this subsection (15)(a)(xix): (A) Instructional lessons; (B) permits issued by a governmental entity to park a vehicle on or access public lands; and (C) permits or leases granted by an owner of private timberland for recreational access to areas used primarily for growing and harvesting timber; and(xx) Scuba diving; snorkeling; river rafting; surfing; kiteboarding; flyboarding; water slides; inflatables, such as water pillows, water trampolines, and water rollers; and similar water sports and activities.(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this subsection (15), the term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include charges:(i) Made for admission to, and rides or attractions at, fairs, carnivals, and festivals. For the purposes of this subsection, fairs, carnivals, and festivals are events that do not exceed 21 days and a majority of the amusement rides, if any, are not affixed to real property;(ii) Made by an educational institution to its students and staff for activities defined as retail sales by (a)(i) through (xx) of this subsection. However, charges made by an educational institution to its alumni or other members of the general public for these activities are a retail sale under this subsection (15). For purposes of this subsection (15)(b)(ii), "educational institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.170;(iii) Made by a vocational school for commercial diver training that is licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW; or(iv) Made for day camps offered by a nonprofit organization or state or local governmental entity that provide youth not older than age 18, or that are focused on providing individuals with disabilities or mental illness, the opportunity to participate in a variety of supervised activities.(16)(a) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the purchase or acquisition of tangible personal property and specified services by a person who receives either a qualifying grant exempt from tax under RCW 82.04.767 or 82.16.320 or a grant deductible under RCW 82.04.4339, except for transactions excluded from the definition of "sale at retail" or "retail sale" by any other provision of this section. Nothing in this subsection (16) may be construed to limit the application of any other provision of this section to purchases by a recipient of either a qualifying grant exempt from tax under RCW 82.04.767 or a grant deductible under RCW 82.04.4339, or by any other person.(b) For purposes of this subsection (16), "specified services" means:(i) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation;(ii) The clearing of land or the moving of earth, whether or not associated with activities described in (b)(i) of this subsection (16);(iii) The razing or moving of existing buildings or structures; and(iv) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services.(17) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include the following services if the sale occurs between members of an affiliated group as defined in RCW 82.04.299(1)(f):(a) Services described in subsection (3)(g) through (i), (k), and (l) of this section whether provided in-person or transferred electronically;(b) Custom software and customization of prewritten computer software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user;(c) Any digital automated services that primarily involves the application of human effort by the seller, and the human effort originated after the customer requested the service; and(d) Data processing services. For purposes of this subsection (17), "data processing service" has the same meaning as in subsection (3)(g)(ii) of this section.(18) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" does not include services provided by a public agency to another public agency pursuant to an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW.Sec. 3. RCW 82.04.060 and 2017 c 323 s 512 are each amended to read as follows:"Sale at wholesale" or "wholesale sale" means:(1) Any sale, which is not a sale at retail, of:(a) Tangible personal property;(b) Services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2) (a) or (g) or (3) (g) through (k);(c) Activities defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(15);(d) Prewritten computer software;(e) Services described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b);(f) Extended warranties as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7);(g) Competitive telephone service, ancillary services, or telecommunications service as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065; or(h) Digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services;(2) Any charge made for labor and services rendered for persons who are not consumers, in respect to real or personal property, if such charge is expressly defined as a retail sale by RCW 82.04.050 when rendered to or for consumers. For the purposes of this subsection (2), "real or personal property" does not include any natural products named in RCW 82.04.100; and(3) The sale of any service for resale, if the sale is excluded from the definition of "sale at retail" and "retail sale" in RCW 82.04.050(14).Sec. 4. RCW 82.04.192 and 2025 c 422 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:(1) "Digital audio works" means works that result from the fixation of a series of musical, spoken, or other sounds, including ringtones.(2) "Digital audiovisual works" means a series of related images which, when shown in succession, impart an impression of motion, together with accompanying sounds, if any.(3)(a) "Digital automated service," except as provided in (b) of this subsection (3), means any service transferred electronically that uses one or more software applications.(b) "Digital automated service" does not include:(i) The loaning or transferring of money or the purchase, sale, or transfer of financial instruments. For purposes of this subsection (3)(b)(i), "financial instruments" include cash, accounts receivable and payable, loans and notes receivable and payable, debt securities, equity securities, as well as derivative contracts such as forward contracts, swap contracts, and options;(ii) Dispensing cash or other physical items from a machine;(iii) Payment processing services;(iv) Parimutuel wagering and handicapping contests as authorized by chapter 67.16 RCW;(v) Telecommunications services and ancillary services as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065;(vi) The internet and internet access as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.297;(vii) The service described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(b);(viii) Online educational programs provided by a:(A) Public or private elementary or secondary school; or(B) An institution of higher education as defined in sections 1001 or 1002 of the federal higher education act of 1965 (Title 20 U.S.C. Secs. 1001 and 1002), as existing on July 1, 2009. For purposes of this subsection (3)(b)(viii)(B), an online educational program must be encompassed within the institution's accreditation;(ix) Travel agent services, including online travel services, and automated systems used by travel agents to book reservations;(x)(A) A service that allows the person receiving the service to make online sales of products or services, digital or otherwise, using either: (I) The service provider's website; or (II) the service recipient's website, but only when the service provider's technology is used in creating or hosting the service recipient's website or is used in processing orders from customers using the service recipient's website.(B) The service described in this subsection (3)(b)(x) does not include the underlying sale of the products or services, digital or otherwise, by the person receiving the service;(xi) Telehealth as defined in RCW 18.134.010 or telemedicine as defined in RCW 48.43.735;(xii) The mere storage of digital products, digital codes, computer software, or master copies of software. This exclusion from the definition of digital automated services includes providing space on a server for web hosting or the backing up of data or other information; ((and))(xiii) Digital goods;(xiv)(A) The use of a digital automated service that is incidental to the underlying service. The department may establish factors that demonstrate the use of the digital automated service is incidental to an underlying service, which must include, at a minimum, but is not limited to, the following:(I) The buyer of the underlying service uses the digital automated service provided by the service provider solely for the purpose of transmitting or exchanging communications between the service provider and the buyer; and(II) There is no consideration from the buyer of the underlying service for the use of a digital automated service when the use is solely for the purposes of transmitting or exchanging communications between the service provider and the buyer of the underlying service.(B) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(b)(xiv):(I) "Buyer" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.010;(II) "Service provider" means a person providing an underlying service;(III) "Underlying service" means any service provided by a person whose gross income of the business from such service would be subject to business and occupation tax under any business and occupation tax classification other than the retailing service tax classification under RCW 82.04.250, if the exclusion in this subsection (3)(b)(xiv) were to apply.(4) "Digital books" means works that are generally recognized in the ordinary and usual sense as books.(5) "Digital code" means a code that provides a purchaser with the right to obtain one or more digital products, if all of the digital products to be obtained through the use of the code have the same sales and use tax treatment. "Digital code" does not include a code that represents a stored monetary value that is deducted from a total as it is used by the purchaser. "Digital code" also does not include a code that represents a redeemable card, gift card, or gift certificate that entitles the holder to select digital products of an indicated cash value. A digital code may be obtained by any means, including email or by tangible means regardless of its designation as song code, video code, book code, or some other term.(6)(a) "Digital goods," except as provided in (b) of this subsection (6), means sounds, images, data, facts, or information, or any combination thereof, transferred electronically, including, but not limited to, specified digital products and other products transferred electronically not included within the definition of specified digital products.(b) The term "digital goods" does not include:(i) Telecommunications services and ancillary services as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065;(ii) Computer software as defined in RCW 82.04.215;(iii) The internet and internet access as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.297;(iv)(A) Except as provided in (b)(iv)(B) of this subsection (6), the representation of a personal or professional service in electronic form, such as an electronic copy of an engineering report prepared by an engineer, where the service primarily involves the application of human effort by the service provider, and the human effort originated after the customer requested the service.(B) The exclusion in (b)(iv)(A) of this subsection (6) does not apply to photographers in respect to amounts received for the taking of photographs that are transferred electronically to the customer, but only if the customer is an end user, as defined in RCW 82.04.190(11), of the photographs. Such amounts are considered to be for the sale of digital goods; and(v) Services and activities excluded from the definition of digital automated services in subsection (3)(b)(i) through (xii) of this section and not otherwise described in (b)(i) through (iv) of this subsection (6).(7) "Digital products" means digital goods and digital automated services.(8) "Electronically transferred" or "transferred electronically" means obtained by the purchaser by means other than tangible storage media. It is not necessary that a copy of the product be physically transferred to the purchaser. So long as the purchaser may access the product, it will be considered to have been electronically transferred to the purchaser.(9) "Specified digital products" means electronically transferred digital audiovisual works, digital audio works, and digital books.(10) "Subscription radio services" means the sale of audio programming by a radio broadcaster as defined in RCW 82.08.0208, except as otherwise provided in this subsection. "Subscription radio services" does not include audio programming that is sold on a pay-per-program basis or that allows the buyer to access a library of programs at any time for a specific charge for that service.(11) "Subscription television services" means the sale of video programming by a television broadcaster as defined in RCW 82.08.0208, except as otherwise provided in this subsection. "Subscription television services" does not include video programming that is sold on a pay-per-program basis or that allows the buyer to access a library of programs at any time for a specific charge for that service, but only if the seller is not subject to a franchise fee in this state under the authority of Title 47 U.S.C. Sec. 542(a) on the gross revenue derived from the sale.Sec. 5. RCW 82.04.299 and 2025 c 420 s 301 and 2025 c 401 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Beginning with business activities occurring on or after April 1, 2020, in addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.290 (2) and (4), a workforce education investment surcharge is imposed on select advanced computing businesses.(i) Beginning April 1, 2020, through December 31, 2025, the surcharge is equal to the gross income of the business subject to the tax under RCW 82.04.290 (2) and (4), multiplied by the rate of 1.22 percent.(ii) Beginning January 1, 2026, the surcharge is equal to the gross income of the business subject to the tax under RCW 82.04.290 (2) and (4), multiplied by the rate of 7.5 percent.(b) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection (1), in no case will the combined surcharge imposed under this subsection (1) paid by all members of an affiliated group be more than $75,000,000 annually.(c) For persons subject to the surcharge imposed under this subsection (1) that report under one or more tax classifications, the surcharge applies only to business activities taxed under RCW 82.04.290 (2) and (4).(d) The surcharge imposed under this subsection (1) must be reported and paid on a quarterly basis in a manner as required by the department. Returns and amounts payable under this subsection (1) are due by the last day of the month immediately following the end of the reporting period covered by the return. All other taxes must be reported and paid as required under RCW 82.32.045.(e)(i) To aid in the effective administration of the surcharge in this subsection (1), the department may require persons believed to be engaging in advanced computing or affiliated with a person believed to be engaging in advanced computing to disclose whether they are a member of an affiliated group and, if so, to identify all other members of the affiliated group subject to the surcharge.(ii) If the department establishes, by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, that one or more members of an affiliated group, with intent to evade the surcharge under this subsection (1), failed to fully comply with this subsection (1)(e), the department must assess against that person, or those persons collectively, a penalty equal to 50 percent of the amount of the total surcharge payable by all members of that affiliated group for the calendar year during which the person or persons failed to fully comply with this subsection (1)(e). The penalty under this subsection (1)(e) is in lieu of and not in addition to the evasion penalty under RCW 82.32.090(7).(f) For the purposes of this subsection (1) the following definitions apply:(i) "Advanced computing" means designing or developing computer software or computer hardware, whether directly or contracting with another person, including: Modifications to computer software or computer hardware; cloud computing services; or operating as a marketplace facilitator as defined by RCW 82.08.0531, an online search engine, or online social networking platform;(ii) "Affiliate" and "affiliated" means a person that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person;(iii) "Affiliated group" means a group of two or more persons that are affiliated with each other;(iv) "Cloud computing services" means on-demand delivery of computing resources, such as networks, servers, storage, applications, and services, over the internet;(v) "Control" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of more than 50 percent of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting shares, by contract, or otherwise; and(vi) "Select advanced computing business" means a person who is a member of an affiliated group with at least one member of the affiliated group engaging in the business of advanced computing, and the affiliated group has worldwide gross revenue of more than $25,000,000,000 during the immediately preceding calendar year. A person who is primarily engaged within this state in the provision of commercial mobile service, as that term is defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 332(d)(1), shall not be considered a select advanced computing business. A person who is primarily engaged in this state in the operation and provision of access to transmission facilities and infrastructure that the person owns or leases for the transmission of voice, data, text, sound, and video using wired telecommunications networks shall not be considered a select advanced computing business. A person that is primarily engaged in business as a "financial institution" as defined in RCW 82.04.29004, as that section existed on January 1, 2020, shall not be considered a select advanced computing business. For purposes of this subsection (1)(f)(vi), "primarily" is determined based on gross income of the business.(2)(a) The workforce education investment surcharge under this section does not apply to:(i) Any hospital as defined in RCW 70.41.020, including any hospital that comes within the scope of chapter 71.12 RCW if the hospital is also licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW; or(ii) A provider clinic offering primary care, multispecialty and surgical services, including behavioral health services, and any affiliate of the provider clinic if the affiliate is an organization that offers health care services or provides administrative support for a provider clinic, or is an independent practice association or accountable care organization.(b) The exemptions under this subsection (2) do not apply to amounts received by any member of an affiliated group other than the businesses described in (a) of this subsection.(c) For purposes of the exemption in (a)(ii) of this subsection:(i) "Health care services" means services offered by health care providers relating to the prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.(ii) "Primary care" means wellness and prevention services and the diagnosis and treatment of health conditions.(3) Revenues from the surcharge under this section must be deposited directly into the workforce education investment account established in RCW 43.79.195.(4) Beginning in fiscal year 2028, and each year thereafter, when the number of qualified Washington state applicants exceeds the available enrollments by 100 at computer science engineering degree programs in four-year state universities, then a commensurate number of computer science and engineering degree enrollments at those state universities must be automatically added and funded for the surcharge imposed under this section to accommodate the additional demand.(5) The department has the authority to determine through an audit or other investigation whether a person is subject to the surcharge imposed in this section.Sec. 6. RCW 82.04.29004 and 2025 c 423 s 201, 2025 c 420 s 202, and 2025 c 401 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1)(a) From January 1, 2020, through September 30, 2025, in addition to any other taxes imposed under this chapter, an additional tax is imposed on specified financial institutions. The additional tax is equal to the gross income of the business taxable under RCW 82.04.290 (2) and (4) multiplied by the rate of 1.2 percent.(b) Beginning October 1, 2025, in addition to any other taxes imposed under this chapter, an additional tax is imposed on specified financial institutions. The additional tax is equal to the gross income of the business taxable under RCW 82.04.290 (2) and (4) multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Affiliated" means a person that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person. For purposes of this subsection (2)(a), "control" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of more than 50 percent of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting shares, by contract, or otherwise.(b) "Consolidated financial institution group" means all financial institutions that are affiliated with each other.(c) "Consolidated financial statement" means a consolidated financial institution group's consolidated reports of condition and income filed with the federal financial institutions examination council, or successor agency.(d) "Financial institution" means:(i) Any corporation or other business entity chartered under Titles 30A, 30B, 31, 32, and 33 RCW, or registered under the federal bank holding company act of 1956, as amended, or registered as a savings and loan holding company under the federal national housing act, as amended;(ii) A national bank organized and existing as a national bank association pursuant to the provisions of the national bank act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 21 et seq.;(iii) A savings association or federal savings bank as defined in the federal deposit insurance act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1813(b)(1);(iv) Any bank or thrift institution incorporated or organized under the laws of any state;(v) Any corporation organized under the provisions of 12 U.S.C. Sec. 611 through 631;(vi) Any agency or branch of a foreign depository as defined in 12 U.S.C. Sec. 3101;(vii) A production credit association organized under the federal farm credit act of 1933, all of whose stock held by the federal production credit corporation has been retired;(viii) Any corporation or other business entity who receives gross income taxable under RCW 82.04.290, and whose voting interests are more than 50 percent owned, directly or indirectly, by any person or business entity described in (d)(i) through (vii) of this subsection other than an insurance company liable for the insurance premiums tax under RCW 48.14.020 or any other company taxable under chapter 48.14 RCW;(ix)(A) A corporation or other business entity that receives more than 50 percent of its total gross income for federal income tax purposes from finance leases. For purposes of this subsection, a "finance lease" means a lease that meets two requirements:(I) It is the type of lease permitted to be made by national banks (see 12 U.S.C. Sec. 24(7) and (10), comptroller of the currency regulations, part 23, leasing (added by 56 C.F.R. Sec. 28314, June 20, 1991, effective July 22, 1991), and regulation Y of the federal reserve system 12 C.F.R. Part 225.25, as amended); and(II) It is the economic equivalent of an extension of credit, i.e., the lease is treated by the lessor as a loan for federal income tax purposes. In no event does a lease qualify as an extension of credit where the lessor takes depreciation on such property for federal income tax purposes.(B) For this classification to apply, the average of the gross income in the current tax year and immediately preceding two tax years must satisfy the more than 50 percent requirement;(x) Any other person or business entity, other than an insurance general agent taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1)(e), an insurance business exempt from the business and occupation tax under RCW 82.04.320, a real estate broker taxable under RCW 82.04.255, a securities dealer or international investment management company taxable under RCW 82.04.290(2), that receives more than 50 percent of its gross receipts from activities that a person described in (d)(ii) through (vii) and (ix) of this subsection is authorized to transact.(e)(i) "Specified financial institution" means a financial institution that is a member of a consolidated financial institution group that reported on its consolidated financial statement for the previous calendar year annual net income of at least $1,000,000,000, not including net income attributable to noncontrolling interests, as the terms "net income" and "noncontrolling interest" are used in the consolidated financial statement.(ii) If financial institutions are no longer required to file consolidated financial statements, "specified financial institution" means any person that was subject to the additional tax in this section in at least two of the previous four calendar years.(3) The department must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature if financial institutions are no longer required to file consolidated financial statements.(4) To aid in the effective administration of the additional tax imposed in this section, the department may require a person believed to be a specified financial institution to disclose whether it is a member of a consolidated financial institution group and, if so, to identify all other members of its consolidated financial institution group. A person failing to comply with this subsection is deemed to have intended to evade tax payable under this section and is subject to the penalty in RCW 82.32.090(7) on any tax due under this section by the person and any financial institution affiliated with the person.(5) Taxes collected under this section must be deposited into the general fund.Sec. 7. RCW 82.04.4451 and 2022 c 295 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter, as provided in this section. Except for taxpayers that report at least 50 percent of their taxable amount under RCW 82.04.255, 82.04.290(2)(a), ((and)) 82.04.285, and 82.04.405, the maximum credit for a taxpayer for a reporting period is $55 multiplied by the number of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW 82.32.045. For a taxpayer that reports at least 50 percent of its taxable amount under RCW 82.04.255, 82.04.290(2)(a), ((and)) 82.04.285, and 82.04.405, the maximum credit for a reporting period is $160 multiplied by the number of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW 82.32.045.(2) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter is equal to or less than the maximum credit, a credit is allowed equal to the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter.(3) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter exceeds the maximum credit, a reduced credit is allowed equal to twice the maximum credit, minus the tax otherwise due under this chapter, but not less than zero.(4) The department may prepare a tax credit table consisting of tax ranges using increments of no more than five dollars and a corresponding tax credit to be applied to those tax ranges. The table shall be prepared in such a manner that no taxpayer will owe a greater amount of tax by using the table than would be owed by performing the calculation under subsections (1) through (3) of this section. A table prepared by the department under this subsection must be used by all taxpayers in taking the credit provided in this section.Sec. 8. RCW 82.08.010 and 2022 c 16 s 144 are each amended to read as follows:For the purposes of this chapter:(1)(a)(i) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means the total amount of consideration, except separately stated trade-in property of like kind, including cash, credit, property, and services, for which tangible personal property, extended warranties, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or other services or anything else defined as a "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1), no deduction from the total amount of consideration is allowed for the following: (A) The seller's cost of the property sold; (B) the cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, all costs of transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed on the seller, and any other expense of the seller; (C) charges by the seller for any services necessary to complete the sale, other than delivery and installation charges; (D) delivery charges; and (E) installation charges.(ii) When tangible personal property is rented or leased under circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the "selling price" must be determined as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe;(b) "Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts, including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale; interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the sale of tangible personal property, extended warranties, digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or other services or anything else defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050, if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser; and any taxes legally imposed directly on the consumer, or collected from the consumer pursuant to RCW 35.87A.010(2)(b), that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;(c) "Selling price" or "sales price" includes consideration received by the seller from a third party if:(i) The seller actually receives consideration from a party other than the purchaser, and the consideration is directly related to a price reduction or discount on the sale;(ii) The seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction or discount through to the purchaser;(iii) The amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of the item to the purchaser; and(iv) One of the criteria in this subsection (1)(c)(iv) is met:(A) The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other documentation to the seller to claim a price reduction or discount where the coupon, certificate, or documentation is authorized, distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding that the third party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon, certificate, or documentation is presented;(B) The purchaser identifies himself or herself to the seller as a member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or discount, however a "preferred customer" card that is available to any patron does not constitute membership in such a group; or(C) The price reduction or discount is identified as a third party price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the purchaser or on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation presented by the purchaser;(2)(a)(i) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or principal, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (2).(ii) "Seller" includes marketplace facilitators, whether making sales in their own right or facilitating sales on behalf of marketplace sellers.(b)(i) "Seller" does not include:(A) The state and its departments and institutions when making sales to the state and its departments and institutions; or(B) A professional employer organization when a covered employee coemployed with the client under the terms of a professional employer agreement engages in activities that constitute a sale at retail that is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter. In such cases, the client, and not the professional employer organization, is deemed to be the seller and is responsible for collecting and remitting the tax imposed by this chapter.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (2)(b), the terms "client," "covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and "professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.04.540;(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association, society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal property or services for preparation and delivery to a location designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including, but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling, crating, and packing;(5) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed material delivered to a single address;(6) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state," "within this state," "cannabis," "useable cannabis," and "cannabis-infused products" applies equally to the provisions of this chapter;(7) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. Tangible personal property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten computer software;(8) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.050(7);(9) The definitions in RCW 82.04.192 apply to this chapter;(10) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW, whenever the terms "property" or "personal property" are used, those terms must be construed to include digital goods and products sold through the use of digital codes unless:(a) It is clear from the context that the term "personal property" is intended only to refer to tangible personal property;(b) It is clear from the context that the term "property" is intended only to refer to tangible personal property, real property, or both; or(c) To construe the term "property" or "personal property" as including digital goods and products sold through the use of digital codes would yield unlikely, absurd, or strained consequences; and(11) "Retail sale" or "sale at retail" means any sale, lease, or rental for any purpose other than for resale, sublease, or subrent.(12) The terms "agriculture," "farming," "horticulture," "horticultural," and "horticultural product" may not be construed to include or relate to cannabis, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products unless the applicable term is explicitly defined to include cannabis, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused products.(13)(a) "Affiliated person" means a person that, with respect to another person:(i) Has an ownership interest of more than five percent, whether direct or indirect, in the other person; or(ii) Is related to the other person because a third person, or group of third persons who are affiliated persons with respect to each other, holds an ownership interest of more than five percent, whether direct or indirect, in the related persons.(b) For purposes of this subsection (13):(i) "Ownership interest" means the possession of equity in the capital, the stock, or the profits of the other person; and(ii) An indirect ownership interest in a person is an ownership interest in an entity that has an ownership interest in the person or in an entity that has an indirect ownership interest in the person.(14) "Marketplace" means a physical or electronic place, including, but not limited to, a store, a booth, an internet website, a catalog or a dedicated sales software application, where tangible personal property, products sold through the use of digital codes and digital products, or services are offered for sale.(15)(a) "Marketplace facilitator" means a person that:(i) Contracts with sellers to facilitate for consideration, regardless of whether deducted as fees from the transaction, the sale of the seller's products through a marketplace owned or operated by the person;(ii) Engages directly or indirectly, through one or more affiliated persons, in transmitting or otherwise communicating the offer or acceptance between the buyer and seller. For purposes of this subsection, mere advertising does not constitute transmitting or otherwise communicating the offer or acceptance between the buyer and seller; and(iii) Engages directly or indirectly, through one or more affiliated persons, in any of the following activities with respect to the seller's products:(A) Payment processing services;(B) Fulfillment or storage services;(C) Listing products for sale;(D) Setting prices;(E) Branding sales as those of the marketplace facilitator;(F) Taking orders; or(G) Providing customer service or accepting or assisting with returns or exchanges.(b)(i) "Marketplace facilitator" does not include:(A) A person who provides internet advertising services, including listing products for sale, so long as the person does not also engage in the activity described in (a)(ii) of this subsection (15) in addition to any of the activities described in (a)(iii) of this subsection (15); or(B) A person with respect to the provision of travel agency services or the operation of a marketplace or that portion of a marketplace that enables consumers to purchase transient lodging accommodations in a hotel or other commercial transient lodging facility.(ii) The exclusion in this subsection (15)(b) does not apply to a marketplace or that portion of a marketplace that facilitates the ((retail)):(A) Retail sale of transient lodging accommodations in homes, apartments, cabins, or other residential dwelling units; or(B) Sharing of motor vehicles through a peer-to-peer car sharing program, as defined in RCW 46.74A.010.(iii) For purposes of this subsection (15)(b), the following definitions apply:(A) "Hotel" has the same meaning as in RCW 19.48.010.(B) "Travel agency services" means arranging or booking, for a commission, fee or other consideration, vacation or travel packages, rental car or other travel reservations or accommodations, tickets for domestic or foreign travel by air, rail, ship, bus, or other medium of transportation, or hotel or other lodging accommodations. "Travel agency services" does not mean facilitating or engaging in peer-to-peer car sharing or operating a peer-to-peer car sharing program, as those terms are defined in RCW 46.74A.010.(16) "Marketplace seller" means a seller that makes retail sales through any marketplace operated by a marketplace facilitator, regardless of whether the seller is required to be registered with the department under RCW 82.32.030.(17) "Remote seller" means any seller, including a marketplace facilitator, who does not have a physical presence in this state and makes retail sales to purchasers or facilitates retail sales on behalf of marketplace sellers.Sec. 9. RCW 82.08.020 and 2025 c 418 s 3 and 2025 c 417 s 201 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state of:(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services, if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale.(2)(a) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal to:(i) Eleven and nine-tenths percent of the selling price from January 1, 2026, through December 31, 2026; and(ii)(A) Nine and nine-tenths percent of the selling price beginning January 1, 2027.(B) The revenue collected under (a) of this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(b)(i) Beginning January 1, 2027, there is levied and collected an additional tax on peer-to-peer car sharing transactions equal to the selling price multiplied by the rate of tax imposed under (a) of this subsection. This subsection (2)(b) applies only to peer-to-peer car sharing transactions where the vehicle owner obtained the shared vehicle as a vehicle for resale using a reseller permit or an approved exemption certificate under RCW 82.04.470. The revenue collected under this subsection (2)(b) must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(ii)(A) Beginning January 1, 2027, a peer-to-peer car sharing program may not allow a vehicle to be placed on a digital network or software application of the peer-to-peer car sharing program for the purpose of making the vehicle available for sharing through the peer-to-peer car sharing program unless the peer-to-peer car sharing program receives an electronic certification from the shared vehicle owner as to whether the shared vehicle owner obtained the shared vehicle as a vehicle for resale using a reseller permit or an approved exemption certificate under RCW 82.04.470.(B) The peer-to-peer car sharing program shall maintain a record of such certification for a period of no less than five years.(iii) A peer-to-peer car sharing program may rely in good faith on the shared vehicle owner's certification as to whether the shared vehicle owner obtained the shared vehicle as a vehicle for resale using a reseller permit or an approved exemption certificate under RCW 82.04.470. If the peer-to-peer car sharing program relies in good faith on the shared vehicle owner's certification as to whether the shared vehicle owner obtained the shared vehicle as a vehicle for resale using a reseller permit or an approved exemption certificate under RCW 82.04.470, the peer-to-peer car sharing program is not liable for any tax, penalty, fee, or other sanction imposed on the shared vehicle owner.(iv) For purposes of this ((subsection (2)(b)))section, "peer-to-peer car sharing" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.74A.010. "Peer-to-peer car sharing" does not mean:(A) "Retail car rental" as defined in RCW 82.08.011; or(B) "Rental car" as defined in RCW 46.04.465 or 48.115.005.(3) There is levied and collected an additional tax of five-tenths of one percent of the selling price on each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail car rentals and peer-to-peer car sharing transactions taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(4)(a) Beginning July 1, 2026, in addition to taxes required under this chapter and chapters 82.12 and 82.49 RCW, there is levied and collected an additional tax of five-tenths of one percent on the selling price, plus trade-in property of like kind, for purchased recreational vessels.(b) In the case of a lease requiring periodic payments, the tax is imposed on the fair market value of the recreational vessel at the inception of the lease.(c) The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(d) For purposes of this subsection, "recreational vessel" means a vessel as defined in RCW 88.02.310 that is subject to watercraft excise tax under chapter 82.49 RCW.(5) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include:(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181, unless the farm tractor or farm vehicle is for use in the production of cannabis;(b) Off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365;(c) Nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.310; and(d) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.(6) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited in the performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.(7) Beginning July 1, 2027, the portion of taxes collected by the state under subsection (1) of this section equal to 0.1 percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(8) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to successive retail sales of the same property.(9) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.Sec. 10. RCW 82.08.0208 and 2020 c 139 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of a digital code for one or more digital products if the sale of the digital products to which the digital code relates is exempt from the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020.(2)(a) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to a business or other organization for the purpose of making the digital good or digital automated service, including a digital good or digital automated service acquired through the use of a digital code, or service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b), available free of charge for the use or enjoyment of the general public. The exemption provided in this subsection (2) does not apply unless the purchaser has the legal right to broadcast, rebroadcast, transmit, retransmit, license, relicense, distribute, redistribute, or exhibit the product, in whole or in part, to the general public.(b) For purposes of this subsection (2), "general public" means all persons and not limited or restricted to a particular class of persons, except that the general public includes:(i) A class of persons that is defined as all persons residing or owning property within the boundaries of a state, political subdivision of a state, or a municipal corporation; and(ii) With respect to libraries, authorized library patrons.(3)(a) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale to a business of digital goods, and services rendered in respect to digital goods, if the digital goods and services rendered in respect to digital goods are purchased solely for business purposes. The exemption provided by this subsection (3) also applies to the sale to a business of a digital code if all of the digital goods to be obtained through the use of the code will be used solely for business purposes.(b) For purposes of this subsection (3), the following definitions apply:(i) "Business purposes" means any purpose relevant to the business needs of the taxpayer claiming an exemption under this subsection (3). Business purposes do not include any personal, family, or household purpose. The term also does not include any activity conducted by a government entity as that term is defined in RCW 7.25.005; and(ii) "Services rendered in respect to digital goods" means those services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2)(g).(4)(a) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b) to a buyer that provides the seller with an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use. An exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use must be in a form and contain such information as required by the department.(b) A buyer is entitled to use an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use only if the buyer is a business or other organization and the digital goods or digital automated services purchased, or the digital goods or digital automated services to be obtained by the digital code purchased, or the prewritten computer software or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b) purchased will be concurrently available for use within and outside this state. A buyer is not entitled to use an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use for digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b) purchased for personal use.(c) A buyer claiming an exemption under this subsection (4) must report and pay the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 and any local use taxes imposed under the authority of chapter 82.14 RCW and RCW 81.104.170 directly to the department in accordance with RCW 82.12.0208 and 82.14.457.(d) For purposes of this subsection (4), "concurrently available for use within and outside this state" means that employees or other agents of the buyer may use the digital goods, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b) simultaneously from one or more locations within this state and one or more locations outside this state. A digital code is concurrently available for use within and outside this state if employees or other agents of the buyer may use the digital goods or digital automated services to be obtained by the code simultaneously at one or more locations within this state and one or more locations outside this state.(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (5), the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of audio or video programming by a radio or television broadcaster.(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection (5), the exemption provided in this subsection (5) does not apply in respect to programming that is sold on a pay-per-program basis or that allows the buyer to access a library of programs at any time for a specific charge for that service.(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (5) applies to the sale of programming described in (b)(i) of this subsection (5) if the seller is subject to a franchise fee in this state under the authority of Title 47 U.S.C. Sec. 542(a) on the gross revenue derived from the sale.(c) For purposes of this subsection (5), "radio or television broadcaster" includes satellite radio providers, satellite television providers, cable television providers, and providers of subscription internet television.(6)(a) The tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of advertising services when the buyer of the advertising services provides the seller with an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use.(b) A buyer may use an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use only if the buyer is a business or other organization and the buyer purchased advertising services that will be concurrently available for use within and outside this state. A buyer may not use an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use for advertising services purchased for personal use.(c) A buyer claiming an exemption under this section must report and pay the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020, and any local use taxes imposed under the authority of chapter 82.14 RCW and RCW 81.104.170, directly to the department in accordance with RCW 82.12.0208 and 82.14.457.(d) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:(i) "Advertising services" means "advertising services" that are defined as a "retail sale" or "sale at retail" in RCW 82.04.050(3)(k);(ii) "Concurrently available for use within and outside this state" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.12.0208.(7) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under subsection (2) ((or)), (3), or (6) of this section must obtain an exemption certificate from the buyer in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the exemption certificate for the seller's files. In lieu of an exemption certificate, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.Sec. 11. RCW 82.08.9999 and 2022 c 182 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Beginning August 1, 2019, with sales made or lease agreements signed on or after the qualification period start date:(a) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply as provided in (b) of this subsection to sales or leases of new or used passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles that:(i) Are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel; or(ii) Use at least one method of propulsion that is capable of being reenergized by an external source of electricity and are capable of traveling at least 30 miles using only battery power; and(iii)(A) Have a vehicle selling price plus trade-in property of like kind for purchased vehicles that:(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $45,000; or(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $30,000; or(B) Have a fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles that:(I) For a vehicle that is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $45,000; or(II) For a vehicle that is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, does not exceed $30,000;(b)(i) The exemption in this section is applicable for up to the amounts specified in (b)(ii) or (iii) of this subsection of:(A) The total amount of the vehicle's selling price, for sales made; or(B) The total lease payments made plus any additional selling price of the leased vehicle if the original lessee purchases the leased vehicle before the qualification period end date, for lease agreements signed.(ii) Based on the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed of the vehicle if the vehicle is a new vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed:(A) From the qualification period start date until July 31, 2021, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $25,000;(B) From August 1, 2021, until July 31, 2023, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $20,000;(C) From August 1, 2023, until July 31, 2025, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $15,000.(iii) If the vehicle is a used vehicle at the time of the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed, the maximum amount eligible under (b)(i) of this subsection is $16,000.(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. A person claiming the exemption must also submit itemized information to the department for all vehicles for which an exemption is claimed that must include the following: Vehicle make; vehicle model; model year; whether the vehicle has been sold or leased; date of sale or start date of lease; length of lease; sales price for purchased vehicles and fair market value at the inception of the lease for leased vehicles; and the total amount qualifying for the incentive claimed for each vehicle, in addition to the future monthly amount to be claimed for each leased vehicle. This information must be provided in a form and manner prescribed by the department.(3)(a) The department of licensing must maintain and publish a list of all vehicle models qualifying for the tax exemptions under this section or RCW 82.12.9999 until the expiration date of this section, and is authorized to issue final rulings on vehicle model qualification for these criteria. A seller is not responsible for repayment of the tax exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999 for a vehicle if the department of licensing's published list of qualifying vehicle models on the purchase date or the date the lease agreement was signed includes the vehicle model and the department of licensing subsequently removes the vehicle model from the published list, and, if applicable, the vehicle meets the qualifying criterion under subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B) of this section and RCW 82.12.9999(1)(a)(iii)(B).(b) The department of revenue retains responsibility for determining whether a vehicle meets the applicable qualifying criterion under subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B) of this section and RCW 82.12.9999(1)(a)(iii)(B).(4) By the last day of October 2019, and every six months thereafter until ((this section expires))October 31, 2025, based on the best available data, the department must report the following information to the transportation committees of the legislature: The cumulative number of vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999 by month of purchase or lease start and vehicle make and model; the dollar amount of all state retail sales and use taxes exempted on or after the qualification period start date, under this section and RCW 82.12.9999; and estimates of the future costs of leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section and RCW 82.12.9999.(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Clean alternative fuel" means natural gas, propane, hydrogen, or electricity, when used as a fuel in a motor vehicle that meets the California motor vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, effective January 1, 2019, and the rules of the Washington state department of ecology.(b) "Fair market value" has the same meaning as "value of the article used" in RCW 82.12.010.(c) "New vehicle" has the same meaning as "new motor vehicle" in RCW 46.04.358.(d) "Qualification period end date" means August 1, 2025.(e) "Qualification period start date" means August 1, 2019.(f) "Used vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.660.(6)(a) Sales of vehicles delivered to the buyer or leased vehicles for which the lease agreement was signed after the qualification period end date do not qualify for the exemption under this section.(b) All leased vehicles that qualified for the exemption under this section before the qualification period end date must continue to receive the exemption as described under subsection (1)(b) of this section on any lease payments due through the remainder of the lease before August 1, 2028.(7) This section expires August 1, 2028.(8) This section is supported by the revenues generated in RCW 46.17.324, and therefore takes effect only if RCW 46.17.324 is enacted by June 30, 2019.Sec. 12. RCW 82.08.0256 and 2010 c 106 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales (including transfers of title through decree of appropriation) heretofore or hereafter made of the entire operating property of a publicly or privately owned public utility, or of a complete operating integral section thereof, to the state or a political subdivision thereof for use in conducting any public service business as defined in RCW 82.16.010. For purposes of this section, "operating property" includes digital goods and products sold through the use of digital codes.Sec. 13. RCW 82.12.010 and 2023 c 307 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:For the purposes of this chapter:(1) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, has full force and effect with respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter. "Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, also means any person who distributes or displays, or causes to be distributed or displayed, any article of tangible personal property, except newspapers, the primary purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or services. With respect to property distributed to persons within this state by a consumer as defined in this subsection (1), the use of the property is deemed to be by such consumer.(2) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.050(7).(3) "Purchase price" means the same as sales price as defined in RCW 82.08.010.(4)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection (4), "retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property at retail and every person required to collect from purchasers the tax imposed under this chapter.(ii) "Retailer" does not include a professional employer organization when a covered employee coemployed with the client under the terms of a professional employer agreement engages in activities that constitute a sale of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, ((digital code,)) or a sale of any digital automated service or service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((c)))(b) that is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter. In such cases, the client, and not the professional employer organization, is deemed to be the retailer and is responsible for collecting and remitting the tax imposed by this chapter.(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the terms "client," "covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and "professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.04.540.(5) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW.(6) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" have their ordinary meaning, and mean:(a) With respect to tangible personal property, except for natural gas and manufactured gas, the first act within this state by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of tangible personal property (as a consumer), and include installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption within this state;(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the first act within this state after the service has been performed by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of tangible personal property upon which the service was performed (as a consumer), and includes installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;(c) With respect to an extended warranty, the first act within this state after the extended warranty has been acquired by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of tangible personal property to which the extended warranty applies, and includes installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;(d) With respect to a digital good ((or)), including a digital good obtained through the use of a digital code, the first act within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, views, accesses, downloads, possesses, stores, opens, manipulates, or otherwise uses or enjoys the digital good ((or digital code));(e) With respect to a digital automated service, including a digital automated service obtained through the use of a digital code, the first act within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, uses, enjoys, or otherwise receives the benefit of the service;(f) With respect to a service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b), the first act within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, accesses the prewritten computer software;(g) With respect to a service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2)(g), the first act within this state after the service has been performed by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, views, accesses, downloads, possesses, stores, opens, manipulates, or otherwise uses or enjoys the digital good upon which the service was performed; and(h) With respect to natural gas or manufactured gas, the use of which is taxable under RCW 82.12.022, including gas that is also taxable under the authority of RCW 82.14.230, the first act within this state by which the taxpayer consumes the gas by burning the gas or storing the gas in the taxpayer's own facilities for later consumption by the taxpayer.(7)(a) "Value of the article used" is the purchase price for the article of tangible personal property, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. The term also includes, in addition to the purchase price, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to the importation of the article used. In case the article used is acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted, produced, or manufactured by the person using the same or is sold under conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of the article used is determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value of the use of the articles so used must be in an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed, determined as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality and character under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become or are to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so used is determined according to the retail selling price of such articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe.(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than 180 days in any period of 365 consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes by the person in this state, the value of the article used must be an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles, unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this subsection.(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of the articles used is determined according to the value of the ingredients of such articles.(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved product, the value of the article used is determined by: (i) The retail selling price of such new or improved product when first offered for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered for sale.(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used is determined by the purchase price of such article if, but for the use of the direct pay permit, the transaction would have been subject to sales tax.(g) In the case of asphalt or aggregates manufactured or extracted by a person providing services taxable under RCW 82.04.280(1)(b) and used by that person in providing those services, the value of the asphalt or aggregates is equal to the sum of all direct and indirect costs attributable to the asphalt or aggregates used, plus a public road construction market adjustment of five percent of those costs.(8) "Value of the digital good ((or digital code)) used" means the purchase price for the digital good ((or digital code)), the use of which is taxable under this chapter. If the digital good ((or digital code)) is acquired other than by purchase, the value of the digital good ((or digital code)) must be determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar digital goods ((or digital codes)) of like quality and character under rules the department may prescribe.(9) "Value of the extended warranty used" means the purchase price for the extended warranty, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. If the extended warranty is received by gift or under conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value of the extended warranty, the value of the extended warranty used is determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar extended warranties of like quality and character under rules the department may prescribe.(10) "Value of the service used" means the purchase price for the digital automated service or other service, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. If the service is received by gift or under conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of the service used is determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar services of like quality and character under rules the department may prescribe.Sec. 14. RCW 82.12.020 and 2025 c 418 s 4 and 2025 c 417 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) There is levied and collected from every person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within this state as a consumer any:(a) Article of tangible personal property acquired by the user in any manner, including tangible personal property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including by-products used by the manufacturer thereof, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, irrespective of whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are available for purchase within this state;(b) Prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding prewritten computer software that is either provided free of charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing information, or both;(c) ((Services))(i) Until September 30, 2025, services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((c)))(b), excluding services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b) that are provided free of charge;(ii) Beginning October 1, 2025, services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g), (3) (g), (h), (i), (j), or (k), or (6)(b), excluding services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(b) that are provided free of charge and services excluded from the definition of "sale at retail" or "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050(17);(d) Extended warranty; or(e)(i) Digital good, digital code, or digital automated service, including the use of any services provided by a seller exclusively in connection with digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.(ii) With respect to the use of digital goods, digital automated services, and digital codes acquired by purchase, the tax imposed in this subsection (1)(e) applies in respect to:(A) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right of permanent use;(B) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of use that is less than permanent;(C) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale; and(D) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of the sale.(iii) With respect to digital goods, digital automated services, and digital codes acquired other than by purchase, the tax imposed in this subsection (1)(e) applies regardless of whether or not the consumer has a right of permanent use or is obligated to make continued payment as a condition of use.(2) ((The))(a) Until September 30, 2025, the provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or service taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g) or (6)(((c)))(b), if the sale to, or the use by, the present user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.(b) Beginning October 1, 2025, the provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or service taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g), (3) (g), (h), (i), (j), or (k), or (6)(b), if the sale to, or the use by, the present user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.(3)(a) Except as provided in this section, payment of the tax imposed by this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW by one purchaser or user of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or other service does not have the effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property, extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or other service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.(b) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply:(i) If the sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by his or her bailor or donor;(ii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid based on reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use;(iii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961; ((or))(iv) To the use of digital goods or digital automated services, which were obtained through the use of a digital code, if the sale of the digital code to, or the use of the digital code by, the present user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor; or(v) The use of any service taxable under RCW 82.04.050 if the service is rendered by the taxpayer's own employees in the course of their employment.(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (4), the tax is levied and must be collected in an amount equal to the value of the article used, value of the digital good or digital code used, value of the extended warranty used, or value of the service used by the taxpayer, multiplied by the applicable rates in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.(b) In the case of a seller required to collect use tax from the purchaser, the tax must be collected in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied by the applicable rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.(5) Beginning July 1, 2027, the portion of taxes collected by the state under subsection (1) of this section equal to 0.1 percent of the value of the article used, value of the digital good or digital code used, value of the extended warranty used, or value of the service used by the taxpayer, must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(6) For purposes of the tax imposed in this section, "person" includes anyone within the definition of "buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" in RCW 82.08.010.(7)(a) Beginning July 1, 2026, the tax imposed in this section at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(4) applies to the use of a recreational vessel at the time that it is first used in this state by the consumer.(b) The revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.(c) For purposes of this subsection, "recreational vessel" means a vessel as defined in RCW 88.02.310 that is subject to watercraft excise tax under chapter 82.49 RCW.Sec. 15. RCW 82.12.0208 and 2020 c 139 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of a digital code for one or more digital products, if the use of the digital products to which the digital code relates is exempt from the tax levied by RCW 82.12.020.(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use by a business or other organization of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b) for the purpose of making the digital good or digital automated service, including a digital good or digital automated service acquired through the use of a digital code, or service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b) available free of charge for the use or enjoyment of the general public. For purposes of this subsection (2), "general public" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0208. The exemption provided in this subsection (2) does not apply unless the user has the legal right to broadcast, rebroadcast, transmit, retransmit, license, relicense, distribute, redistribute, or exhibit the product, in whole or in part, to the general public.(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use by students of digital goods furnished by a public or private elementary or secondary school, or an institution of higher education as defined in section 1001 or 1002 of the federal higher education act of 1965 (Title 20 U.S.C. Secs. 1001 and 1002), as existing on July 1, 2009.(4)(a) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of digital goods that are:(i) Of a noncommercial nature, such as personal email communications;(ii) Created solely for an internal audience; or(iii) Created solely for the business needs of the person who created the digital good, including business email communications, but not including the type of digital good that is offered for sale.(b) This subsection (4) does not apply to the use of any digital goods purchased by the user, the user's donor, or anybody on the user's behalf.(5) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of digital products or digital codes obtained by the end user free of charge.(6) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use by a business of digital goods, and services rendered in respect to digital goods, where the digital goods and services rendered in respect to digital goods are used solely for business purposes. The exemption provided by this subsection (6) also applies to the use by a business of a digital code if all of the digital goods to be obtained through the use of the code will be used solely for business purposes. For purposes of this subsection (6), the definitions in RCW 82.08.0208 apply.(7)(a) A business or other organization subject to the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 on the use of digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (3)(k) and (6)(((c)))(b) that are concurrently available for use within and outside this state is entitled to apportion the amount of tax due this state based on users in this state compared to users everywhere.(b)(i) The department may authorize or require an alternative method of apportionment supported by the taxpayer's records that fairly reflects the proportion of in-state to out-of-state use by the taxpayer of the digital goods, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b).(((b)))(ii) For advertising services, as defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(k), the determination of in-state and out-of-state use, for purposes of this subsection (7)(b), is based on the locations where the related advertisements are viewed by a user or otherwise interacted with by a user. If a taxpayer is unable to determine after exercising due diligence the locations where the related advertisements are either viewed by a user, or otherwise interacted with by a user, the department may authorize or require an alternative method that includes, but is not limited to, internet statistics and population.(c) No apportionment under this subsection (7) is allowed unless the apportionment method is supported by the taxpayer's records kept in the ordinary course of business.(((c)))(d) For purposes of this subsection (7), the following definitions apply:(i) "Concurrently available for use within and outside this state" means that the taxpayer, employees, or other agents of the taxpayer may use the digital goods, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b) simultaneously at one or more locations within this state and one or more locations outside this state. A digital code is concurrently available for use within and outside this state if employees or other agents of the taxpayer may use the digital goods or digital automated services to be obtained by the code simultaneously at one or more locations within this state and one or more locations outside this state; and(ii) (("User"))(A) Except as provided otherwise in (d)(ii)(B) of this subsection (7), for the purposes of this subsection (7), "user" means an employee or agent of the taxpayer who is authorized by the taxpayer to use the digital goods, digital automated services, prewritten computer software, or services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(((c)))(b) in the performance of his or her duties as an employee or other agent of the taxpayer.(B) With respect to advertising services, if an alternative method of apportionment is used as allowed or required under (b) of this subsection (7), "user" may also mean a person who views or otherwise interacts with the taxpayer's advertisement. For purposes of this subsection (7)(d)(ii), "advertising service" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.050(3)(k).(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (8), the provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of audio or video programming provided by a radio or television broadcaster.(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection (8), the exemption provided in this subsection (8) does not apply in respect to programming that is sold on a pay-per-program basis or that allows the buyer to access a library of programs at any time for a specific charge for that service.(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (8) applies to the sale of programming described in (b)(i) of this subsection (8) if the seller is subject to a franchise fee in this state under the authority of Title 47 U.S.C. Sec. 542(a) on the gross revenue derived from the sale.(c) For purposes of this subsection (8), "radio or television broadcaster" includes satellite radio providers, satellite television providers, cable television providers, providers of subscription internet television, and persons who provide radio or television broadcasting to listeners or viewers for no charge.Sec. 16. RCW 82.32.023 and 2009 c 535 s 1112 are each amended to read as follows:For purposes of construing those provisions of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement that have been incorporated into this title, and unless the context requires otherwise, the terms "product" and "products" refer to tangible personal property, digital goods, ((digital codes,)) digital automated services, other services, extended warranties, and anything else that can be sold or used.Sec. 17. RCW 82.32.087 and 2015 c 169 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The director may grant a direct pay permit to a taxpayer who demonstrates, to the satisfaction of the director, that the taxpayer meets the requirements of this section. The direct pay permit allows the taxpayer to accrue and remit directly to the department use tax on the acquisition of tangible personal property or sales tax on the sale of or charges made for labor and/or services, in accordance with all of the applicable provisions of this title. Any taxpayer that uses a direct pay permit must remit state and local sales or use tax directly to the department. The agreement by the purchaser to remit tax directly to the department, rather than pay sales or use tax to the seller, relieves the seller of the obligation to collect sales or use tax and requires the buyer to pay use tax on the tangible personal property and sales tax on the sale of or charges made for labor and/or services.(2)(a) A taxpayer may apply for a permit under this section if: (i) The taxpayer's cumulative tax liability is reasonably expected to be two hundred forty thousand dollars or more in the current calendar year; or (ii) the taxpayer makes purchases subject to the taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW in excess of ten million dollars per calendar year. For the purposes of this section, "tax liability" means the amount required to be remitted to the department for taxes administered under this chapter, except for the taxes imposed or authorized by chapters 82.14A, 82.14B, 82.24, 82.27, 82.29A, and 84.33 RCW.(b) Application for a permit must be made in writing to the director in a form and manner prescribed by the department. A taxpayer who transacts business in two or more locations may submit one application to cover the multiple locations.(c) The director must review a direct pay permit application in a timely manner and must notify the applicant, in writing, of the approval or denial of the application. The department must approve or deny an application based on the applicant's ability to comply with local government use tax coding capabilities and responsibilities; requirements for vendor notification; recordkeeping obligations; electronic data capabilities; and tax reporting procedures. Additionally, an application may be denied if the director determines that denial would be in the best interest of collecting taxes due under this title. The department must provide a direct pay permit to an approved applicant with the notice of approval. The direct pay permit must clearly state that the holder is solely responsible for the accrual and payment of the tax imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW and that the seller is relieved of liability to collect tax imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on all sales to the direct pay permit holder. The taxpayer may petition the director for reconsideration of a denial.(d) A taxpayer who uses a direct pay permit must continue to maintain records that are necessary to a determination of the tax liability in accordance with this title. A direct pay permit is not transferable and the use of a direct pay permit may not be assigned to a third party.(3) Taxes for which the direct pay permit is used are due and payable on the tax return for the reporting period in which the taxpayer (a) receives the tangible personal property purchased or in which the labor and/or services are performed or (b) receives an invoice for such property or such labor and/or services, whichever period is earlier.(4) The holder of a direct pay permit must furnish a copy of the direct pay permit to each vendor with whom the taxpayer has opted to use a direct pay permit. Sellers who make sales upon which the sales or use tax is not collected by reason of the provisions of this section, in addition to existing requirements under this title, must maintain a copy of the direct pay permit and any such records or information as the department may specify.(5) A direct pay permit is subject to revocation by the director at any time the department determines that the taxpayer has violated any provision of this section or that revocation would be in the best interests of collecting the taxes due under this title. The notice of revocation must be in writing and is effective either as of the end of the taxpayer's next normal reporting period or a date deemed appropriate by the director and identified in the revocation notice. The taxpayer may petition the director for reconsideration of a revocation and reinstatement of the permit.(6) Any taxpayer who chooses to no longer use a direct pay permit or whose permit is revoked by the department, must return the permit to the department and immediately make a good faith effort to notify all vendors to whom the permit was given, advising them that the permit is no longer valid.(7) Except as provided in this subsection, the direct pay permit may be used for any purchase of tangible personal property and any retail sale under RCW 82.04.050. The direct pay permit may not be used for:(a) Purchases of meals or beverages;(b) Purchases of motor vehicles, trailers, boats, airplanes, and other property subject to requirements for title transactions by the department of licensing;(c) Purchases for which a reseller permit or other documentation authorized under RCW 82.04.470 may be used;(d) Purchases that meet the definitions of RCW 82.04.050 (2) (e) and (f), (3) (a) through (c), (e), (f), and (((g)))(m), (5), and (15); or(e) Other activities subject to tax under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW that the department by rule designates, consistent with the purposes of this section, as activities for which a direct pay permit is not appropriate and may not be used.Sec. 18. RCW 82.32.730 and 2010 c 106 s 229 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsections (5) through (8) of this section, for purposes of collecting or paying sales or use taxes to the appropriate jurisdictions, all sales at retail shall be sourced in accordance with this subsection and subsections (2) through (4) of this section.(a) When tangible personal property, an extended warranty, a digital good, ((digital code,)) digital automated service, or other service defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 is received by the purchaser at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to that business location.(b) When the tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, ((digital code,)) digital automated service, or other service defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 is not received by the purchaser at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to the location where receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's donee, designated as such by the purchaser, occurs, including the location indicated by instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known to the seller.(c) When (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply, the sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the purchaser that is available from the business records of the seller that are maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business when use of this address does not constitute bad faith.(d) When (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection do not apply, the sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith.(e) When (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection do not apply, including the circumstance where the seller is without sufficient information to apply those provisions, then the location shall be determined by the address from which tangible personal property was shipped, from which the digital good ((or digital code)) or the computer software delivered electronically was first available for transmission by the seller, or from which the extended warranty or digital automated service or other service defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 was provided, disregarding for these purposes any location that merely provided the digital transfer of the product sold.(2) The lease or rental of tangible personal property, other than property identified in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, shall be sourced as provided in this subsection.(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic payments, the first periodic payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance with subsection (1) of this section. Periodic payments made subsequent to the first payment are sourced to the primary property location for each period covered by the payment. The primary property location shall be as indicated by an address for the property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor from its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith. The property location is not altered by intermittent use at different locations, such as use of business property that accompanies employees on business trips and service calls.(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.(c) This subsection (2) does not affect the imposition or computation of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.(3) The lease or rental of motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers, or aircraft that do not qualify as transportation equipment shall be sourced as provided in this subsection.(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic payments, each periodic payment is sourced to the primary property location. The primary property location is as indicated by an address for the property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor from its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith. This location is not altered by intermittent use at different locations.(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.(c) This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.(4) The retail sale, including lease or rental, of transportation equipment shall be sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.(5) This subsection applies to direct mail transactions not governed by subsection (6) of this section. (a) This subsection (5)(a) applies to sales of advertising and promotional direct mail.(i) A purchaser of advertising and promotional direct mail may provide the seller with either:(A) A direct pay permit;(B) A streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of exemption claiming direct mail (or other written statement approved, authorized, or accepted by the department); or(C) Information showing the jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is to be delivered to recipients.(ii) If the purchaser provides the permit, certificate, or statement referred to in (a)(i)(A) or (B) of this subsection (5), the seller, in the absence of bad faith, is relieved of all obligations to collect, pay, or remit any tax on any transaction involving advertising and promotional direct mail to which the permit, certificate, or statement applies. The purchaser must source the sale to the jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is to be delivered to the recipients and must report and pay any applicable tax due.(iii) If the purchaser provides the seller information showing the jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is to be delivered to recipients, the seller must source the sale to the jurisdictions to which the advertising and promotional direct mail is to be delivered and must collect and remit the applicable tax. In the absence of bad faith, the seller is relieved of any further obligation to collect any additional tax on the sale of advertising and promotional direct mail where the seller has sourced the sale according to the delivery information provided by the purchaser.(iv) If the purchaser does not provide the seller with any of the items listed in (a)(i)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection (5), the sale must be sourced according to subsection (1)(e) of this section.(b) This subsection (5)(b) applies to sales of other direct mail.(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (5)(b), sales of other direct mail are sourced in accordance with subsection (1)(c) of this section.(ii) A purchaser of other direct mail may provide the seller with either:(A) A direct pay permit; or(B) A streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of exemption claiming direct mail (or other written statement approved, authorized, or accepted by the department).(iii) If the purchaser provides the permit, certificate, or statement referred to in (b)(ii)(A) or (B) of this subsection (5), the seller, in the absence of bad faith, is relieved of all obligations to collect, pay, or remit any tax on any transaction involving other direct mail to which the permit, certificate, or statement applies. Notwithstanding (b)(i) of this subsection (5), the sale must be sourced to the jurisdictions to which the other direct mail is to be delivered to the recipients, and the purchaser must report and pay any applicable tax due.(6)(a) This subsection applies only with respect to transactions in which direct mail is delivered or distributed from a location within this state to a location within this state.(b) If the purchaser of direct mail provides the seller with a direct pay permit or a streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of exemption claiming direct mail (or other written statement approved, authorized, or accepted by the department), the seller, in the absence of bad faith, is relieved of all obligations to collect, pay, or remit the applicable tax on any transaction involving direct mail to which the permit, certificate, or statement applies. The purchaser must report and pay any applicable tax due. A streamlined sales and use tax agreement certificate of exemption claiming direct mail will remain in effect for all future sales of direct mail by the seller to the purchaser until it is revoked in writing.(c)(i) Except as provided in (b), (c)(ii), and (c)(iii) of this subsection (6), the seller must collect the tax according to subsection (1)(e) of this section.(ii) To the extent the seller knows that a portion of the sale of direct mail will be delivered or distributed to locations in another state, the seller must collect the tax on that portion according to subsection (5) of this section.(iii) Notwithstanding (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection (6), a seller may elect to use the provisions of subsection (5) of this section to source all sales of advertising and promotional direct mail.(7) The following are sourced to the location at or from which delivery is made to the consumer:(a) A retail sale of watercraft;(b) A retail sale of a modular home, manufactured home, or mobile home; (c) A retail sale, excluding the lease and rental, of a motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or aircraft, that do not qualify as transportation equipment; and(d) Florist sales. In the case of a sale in which one florist takes an order from a customer and then communicates that order to another florist who delivers the items purchased to the place designated by the customer, the location at or from which the delivery is made to the consumer is deemed to be the location of the florist originally taking the order.(8)(a) A retail sale of the providing of telecommunications services, as that term is defined in RCW 82.04.065, is sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520.(b) A retail sale of the providing of ancillary services, as that term is defined in RCW 82.04.065, is sourced to the customer's place of primary use of the telecommunications services in respect to which the ancillary services are associated with or incidental to. The definitions of "customer" and "place of primary use" in RCW 82.32.520 apply to this subsection (8)(b).(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.(a) "Advertising and promotional direct mail" means printed material that meets the definition of direct mail, the primary purpose of which is to attract public attention to a product, person, business, or organization, or to attempt to sell, popularize, or secure financial support for a product, person, business, or organization. As used in this subsection (9)(a), the word "product" means tangible personal property, a product transferred electronically, or a service.(b) "Delivered electronically" means delivered to the purchaser by means other than tangible storage media.(c) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed material delivered to a single address.(d)(i) "Other direct mail" means any direct mail that is not advertising and promotional direct mail, regardless of whether advertising and promotional direct mail is included in the same mailing. The term includes, but is not limited to:(A) Transactional direct mail that contains personal information specific to the addressee including, but not limited to, invoices, bills, statements of account, and payroll advices;(B) Any legally required mailings including, but not limited to, privacy notices, tax reports, and stockholder reports; and(C) Other nonpromotional direct mail delivered to existing or former shareholders, customers, employees, or agents including, but not limited to, newsletters and informational pieces.(ii) Other direct mail does not include the development of billing information or the provision of any data processing service that is more than incidental.(e) "Florist sales" means the retail sale of tangible personal property by a florist. For purposes of this subsection (9)(e), "florist" means a person whose primary business activity is the retail sale of fresh cut flowers, potted ornamental plants, floral arrangements, floral bouquets, wreaths, or any similar products, used for decorative and not landscaping purposes.(f) "Receive" and "receipt" mean taking possession of tangible personal property, making first use of digital automated services or other services, or taking possession or making first use of digital goods ((or digital codes)), whichever comes first. "Receive" and "receipt" do not include possession by a shipping company on behalf of the purchaser.(g) "Transportation equipment" means:(i) Locomotives and railcars that are used for the carriage of persons or property in interstate commerce;(ii) Trucks and truck tractors with a gross vehicle weight rating of ten thousand one pounds or greater, trailers, semitrailers, or passenger buses that are:(A) Registered through the international registration plan; and(B) Operated under authority of a carrier authorized and certificated by the United States department of transportation or another federal authority to engage in the carriage of persons or property in interstate commerce;(iii) Aircraft that are operated by air carriers authorized and certificated by the United States department of transportation or another federal or foreign authority to engage in the carriage of persons or property in interstate or foreign commerce; or(iv) Containers designed for use on and component parts attached or secured on the items described in (g)(i) through (iii) of this subsection.(10) In those instances where there is no obligation on the part of a seller to collect or remit this state's sales or use tax, the use of tangible personal property, digital good, ((digital code,)) or of a digital automated service or other service, subject to use tax, is sourced to the place of first use in this state. The definition of use in RCW 82.12.010 applies to this subsection.Sec. 19. RCW 82.48A.020 and 2025 c 417 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) In addition to taxes required under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.48 RCW, there is levied and collected from every person in this state a tax for the privilege of using within this state as a consumer any noncommercial aircraft if the value of the aircraft exceeds $500,000.(b) The tax is levied and must be collected in an amount equal to the value of the aircraft that exceeds $500,000, multiplied by 10 percent.(2) The tax imposed in this section does not apply if the sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under this section or RCW 82.48A.010 and the tax has been paid by the present user or by his or her bailor or donor.(3) The tax imposed in this section does not apply in respect to the use by a nonresident of Washington of a noncommercial aircraft, which is registered or licensed under the laws of the state of his or her residence.(4) For the purposes of this section, "value" means the fair market value of the noncommercial aircraft. In the case of a leased noncommercial aircraft in which the consumer is required to make periodic lease payments, "value" of the aircraft means the fair market value of the aircraft at the inception of the lease.Sec. 20. RCW 83.100.048 and 2025 c 421 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For the purposes of determining the tax due under this chapter, a deduction is allowed for the value of the decedent's qualified family-owned business interests, not to exceed the applicable deduction amount, if:(a) The value of the decedent's qualified family-owned business interests exceed 50 percent of the decedent's Washington taxable estate determined without regard to the deduction for the applicable exclusion amount;(b) During the eight-year period ending on the date of the decedent's death, there have been periods aggregating five years or more during which:(i) Such interests were owned by the decedent or a member of the decedent's family;(ii) There was material participation, within the meaning of section 2032A(e)(6) of the internal revenue code, by the decedent or a member of the decedent's family in the operation of the trade or business to which such interests relate;(c) The qualified family-owned business interests are acquired by any qualified heir from, or passed to any qualified heir from, the decedent, within the meaning of RCW 83.100.046(2), and the decedent was at the time of his or her death a citizen or resident of the United States; and(d) The value of the decedent's qualified family-owned business interests is not more than $6,000,000.(2)(a) Only amounts included in the decedent's federal taxable estate may be deducted under this subsection.(b) Amounts deductible under RCW 83.100.046 may not be deducted under this section.(3)(a) There is imposed an additional estate tax on a qualified heir if, within three years of the decedent's death and before the date of the qualified heir's death:(i) The material participation requirements described in section 2032A(c)(6)(b)(ii) of the internal revenue code are not met with respect to the qualified family-owned business interest which was acquired or passed from the decedent;(ii) The qualified heir disposes of any portion of a qualified family-owned business interest, other than by a disposition to a member of the qualified heir's family or a person with an ownership interest in the qualified family-owned business or through a qualified conservation contribution under section 170(h) of the internal revenue code;(iii) The qualified heir loses United States citizenship within the meaning of section 877 of the internal revenue code or with respect to whom section 877(e)(1) applies, and such heir does not comply with the requirements of section 877(g) of the internal revenue code; or(iv) The principal place of business of a trade or business of the qualified family-owned business interest ceases to be located in the United States.(b) The amount of the additional estate tax imposed under this subsection is equal to the amount of tax savings under this section with respect to the qualified family-owned business interest acquired or passed from the decedent.(c) Interest applies to the tax due under this subsection for the period beginning on the date that the estate tax liability was due under this chapter and ending on the date the additional estate tax due under this subsection is paid. Interest under this subsection must be computed as provided in RCW 83.100.070(2).(d) The tax imposed by this subsection is due the day that is six months after any taxable event described in (a) of this subsection occurred and must be reported on a return as provided by the department.(e) The qualified heir is personally liable for the additional tax imposed by this subsection unless he or she has furnished a bond in favor of the department for such amount and for such time as the department determines necessary to secure the payment of amounts due under this subsection. The qualified heir, on furnishing a bond satisfactory to the department, is discharged from personal liability for any additional tax and interest under this subsection and is entitled to a receipt or writing showing such discharge.(f) Amounts due under this subsection attributable to any qualified family-owned business interest are secured by a lien in favor of the state on the property in respect to which such interest relates. The lien under this subsection (3)(f) arises at the time the Washington return is filed on which a deduction under this section is taken and continues in effect until: (i) The tax liability under this subsection has been satisfied or has become unenforceable by reason of lapse of time; or (ii) the department is satisfied that no further tax liability will arise under this subsection.(g) Security acceptable to the department may be substituted for the lien imposed by (f) of this subsection.(h) For purposes of the assessment or correction of an assessment for additional taxes and interest imposed under this subsection, the limitations period in RCW 83.100.095 begins to run on the due date of the return required under (d) of this subsection.(i) For purposes of this subsection, a qualified heir may not be treated as disposing of an interest described in section 2057(e)(1)(A) of the internal revenue code by reason of ceasing to be engaged in a trade or business so long as the property to which such interest relates is used in a trade or business by any member of the qualified heir's family.(4)(a) The department may require a taxpayer claiming a deduction under this section to provide the department with the names and contact information of all qualified heirs.(b) The department may also require any qualified heir to submit to the department on an ongoing basis such information as the department determines necessary or useful in determining whether the qualified heir is subject to the additional tax imposed in subsection (3) of this section. The department may not require such information more frequently than twice per year. The department may impose a penalty on a qualified heir who fails to provide the information requested within 30 days of the date the department's written request for the information was sent to the qualified heir. The amount of the penalty under this subsection is $500 and may be collected in the same manner as the tax imposed under subsection (3) of this section.(5) For purposes of this section, references to section 2057 of the internal revenue code refer to section 2057 of the internal revenue code, as existing on December 31, 2003.(6) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(a) "Applicable deduction amount" means:(i) $2,500,000 for estates of decedents dying on or after ((July))January 1, 2014, but before July 1, 2025;(ii) $3,000,000 for estates of decedents dying on or after July 1, 2025, but before ((July))January 1, 2026; and(iii) For estates of decedents dying in calendar year 2026 and each calendar year thereafter, the amount in (a)(ii) of this subsection must be adjusted annually, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (6)(a)(iii). The annual adjustment is determined by multiplying $3,000,000 by the sum of one and the percentage by which the most recent October consumer price index exceeds the consumer price index for October 2024, and rounding the result to the nearest $1,000. No adjustment is made for a calendar year if the adjustment would result in the same or a lesser applicable deduction amount than the applicable deduction amount for the immediately preceding calendar year.(b) "Consumer price index" has the same meaning as in RCW 83.100.020.(c) "Member of the decedent's family" and "member of the qualified heir's family" have the same meaning as "member of the family" in RCW 83.100.046.(d) "Qualified family-owned business interest" has the same meaning as provided in section 2057(e) of the internal revenue code of 1986.(e) "Qualified heir" has the same meaning as provided in section 2057(i) of the internal revenue code of 1986.(7) This section applies to the estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 2014.Sec. 21. RCW 84.34.020 and 2025 c 265 s 4 and 2025 c 138 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Open space land" means (a) any land area so designated by an official comprehensive land use plan adopted by any city or county and zoned accordingly; or (b) any land area, the preservation of which in its present use would (i) conserve and enhance natural or scenic resources, or (ii) protect streams or water supply, or (iii) promote conservation of soils, wetlands, beaches or tidal marshes, or (iv) enhance the value to the public of abutting or neighboring parks, forests, wildlife preserves, nature reservations or sanctuaries or other open space, or (v) enhance recreation opportunities, or (vi) preserve historic sites, or (vii) preserve visual quality along highway, road, and street corridors or scenic vistas, or (viii) retain in its natural state tracts of land not less than one acre situated in an urban area and open to public use on such conditions as may be reasonably required by the legislative body granting the open space classification; or (c) any land meeting the definition of farm and agricultural conservation land under subsection (8) of this section. As a condition of granting open space classification, the legislative body may not require public access on land classified under (b)(iii) of this subsection for the purpose of promoting conservation of wetlands.(2) "Farm and agricultural land" means:(a) Any parcel of land that is 20 or more acres or multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total 20 or more acres:(i) Devoted primarily to the production of livestock or agricultural commodities for commercial purposes;(ii) Enrolled in the federal conservation reserve program or its successor administered by the United States department of agriculture; or(iii) Other similar commercial activities as may be established by rule;(b)(i) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than 20 acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which has produced a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent to, as of January 1, 1993:(A) $100 or more per acre per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date of application for classification under this chapter for all parcels of land that are classified under this subsection or all parcels of land for which an application for classification under this subsection is made with the granting authority prior to January 1, 1993; and(B) On or after January 1, 1993, $200 or more per acre per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date of application for classification under this chapter;(ii) For the purposes of (b)(i) of this subsection, "gross income from agricultural uses" includes, but is not limited to:(A) The wholesale value of agricultural products donated to nonprofit food banks or feeding programs; and(B) The wholesale value of agricultural products sold to persons allowed to harvest the agricultural products they purchase, if the products harvested are grown on the same land;(c) Any parcel of land of less than five acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses which has produced a gross income as of January 1, 1993, of:(i) $1,000 or more per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date of application for classification under this chapter for all parcels of land that are classified under this subsection or all parcels of land for which an application for classification under this subsection is made with the granting authority prior to January 1, 1993; and(ii) On or after January 1, 1993, $1,500 or more per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date of application for classification under this chapter. Parcels of land described in (b)(i)(A) and (c)(i) of this subsection will, upon any transfer of the property excluding a transfer to a surviving spouse or surviving state registered domestic partner, be subject to the limits of (b)(i)(B) and (c)(ii) of this subsection;(d) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than 20 acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which meet one of the following criteria:(i) Has produced a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent to $200 or more per acre per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date of application for classification under this chapter;(ii) Has standing crops with an expectation of harvest within seven years, except as provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, and a demonstrable investment in the production of those crops equivalent to $100 or more per acre in the current or previous calendar year. For the purposes of this subsection (2)(d)(ii), "standing crop" means Christmas trees, vineyards, fruit trees, or other perennial crops that: (A) Are planted using agricultural methods normally used in the commercial production of that particular crop; and (B) typically do not produce harvestable quantities in the initial years after planting; or(iii) Has a standing crop of short rotation hardwoods with an expectation of harvest within 15 years and a demonstrable investment in the production of those crops equivalent to $100 or more per acre in the current or previous calendar year;(e) Any lands including incidental uses and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production, preparation, or sale of the agricultural products exist in conjunction with the lands producing such products. Agricultural lands also include any parcel of land of one to five acres, which is not contiguous, but which otherwise constitutes an integral part of farming operations being conducted on land qualifying under this section as "farm and agricultural lands";(f) The land on which housing for employees and the principal place of residence of the farm operator or owner of land classified pursuant to (a) of this subsection is sited if: The housing or residence is on or contiguous to the classified parcel; and the use of the housing or the residence is integral to the use of the classified land for agricultural purposes;(g) Any land that is used primarily for equestrian related activities for which a charge is made, including, but not limited to, stabling, training, riding, clinics, schooling, shows, or grazing for feed and that otherwise meet the requirements of (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection;(h) Any land primarily used for commercial horticultural purposes, including growing seedlings, trees, shrubs, vines, fruits, vegetables, flowers, herbs, and other plants in containers, whether under a structure or not, subject to the following:(i) The land is not primarily used for the storage, care, or selling of plants purchased from other growers for retail sale;(ii) If the land is less than five acres and used primarily to grow plants in containers, such land does not qualify as "farm and agricultural land" if more than 25 percent of the land used primarily to grow plants in containers is open to the general public for on-site retail sales;(iii) If more than 20 percent of the land used for growing plants in containers qualifying under this subsection (2)(h) is covered by pavement, none of the paved area is eligible for classification as "farm and agricultural land" under this subsection (2)(h). The eligibility limitations described in this subsection (2)(h)(iii) do not affect the land's eligibility to qualify under (e) of this subsection; and(iv) If the land classified under this subsection (2)(h), in addition to any contiguous land classified under this subsection, is less than 20 acres, it must meet the applicable income or investment requirements in (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection; or(i) Lands identified in (a) through (h) of this subsection on which an agrivoltaic facility is located.(3) "Timberland" means any parcel of land that is five or more acres or multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total five or more acres which is or are devoted primarily to the growth and harvest of timber for commercial purposes. Timberland means the land only and does not include a residential homesite. The term includes land used for incidental uses ((that are compatible with the growing and harvesting of timber but no more than 10 percent of the land may be used for such incidental uses)). It also includes the land on which appurtenances necessary for the production, preparation, or sale of the timber products exist in conjunction with land producing these products.(4) "Current" or "currently" means as of the date on which property is to be listed and valued by the assessor.(5) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee interest in land, except that where land is subject to real estate contract "owner" means the contract vendee.(6)(a) "Contiguous" means land adjoining and touching other property held by the same ownership. Land divided by a public road, but otherwise an integral part of a farming operation, is considered contiguous.(b) For purposes of this subsection (6):(i) "Same ownership" means owned by the same person or persons, except that parcels owned by different persons are deemed held by the same ownership if the parcels are:(A) Managed as part of a single operation; and(B) Owned by:(I) Members of the same family;(II) Legal entities that are wholly owned by members of the same family; or(III) An individual who owns at least one of the parcels and a legal entity or entities that own the other parcel or parcels if the entity or entities are wholly owned by that individual, members of his or her family, or that individual and members of his or her family.(ii) "Family" includes only:(A) An individual and his or her spouse or domestic partner, child, stepchild, adopted child, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, cousin, or sibling;(B) The spouse or domestic partner of an individual's child, stepchild, adopted child, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, cousin, or sibling;(C) A child, stepchild, adopted child, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, cousin, or sibling of the individual's spouse or the individual's domestic partner; and(D) The spouse or domestic partner of any individual described in (b)(ii)(C) of this subsection (6).(7) "Granting authority" means the appropriate agency or official who acts on an application for classification of land pursuant to this chapter.(8) "Farm and agricultural conservation land" means either:(a) Land that was previously classified under subsection (2) of this section, that no longer meets the criteria of subsection (2) of this section, and that is reclassified under subsection (1) of this section; or(b) Land that is traditional farmland that is not classified under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, that has not been irrevocably devoted to a use inconsistent with agricultural uses, and that has a high potential for returning to commercial agriculture.(9) "Appurtenance" means something used with, and related to or dependent upon another thing that is, something that belongs to something else, an adjunct. The thing appurtenant is strictly necessary and essential to the proper use and enjoyment of the land, as well as useful or necessary for carrying out the purposes for which the land is classified under this chapter.(a) In terms of farm and agricultural land, an "appurtenance" is something used for a particular sort of farm and is widely and routinely used in the operation of the commercial agricultural enterprise.(b) An "appurtenance" includes, but is not limited to, portable sanitation equipment, barn, or tool shed, or equipment used for a particular purpose or task, such as tools, instruments, or machinery.(10) "Incidental use" means ((a use of land classified as farm and agricultural land or timberland that is compatible with commercial agricultural purposes. "Incidental use" for land classified as farm and agricultural land may not exceed 20 percent of the total classified land, while incidental use for timberland may not exceed 10 percent of the total classified land))the following:(a) In the case of land classified as farm and agricultural land, a use of the classified land that:(i) Is compatible with commercial agricultural purposes; and(ii) Does not exceed 20 percent of the total classified land.(b) In the case of land classified as timberland, a use of the classified land that:(i) Is compatible with commercial growing and harvesting of timber; and(ii) Does not exceed 10 percent of the total classified land.(c) An "incidental use" under (a) and (b) of this subsection may include, but is not limited to, wetland preservation, a gravel pit, a farm woodlot, a produce stand, or an unpaved parking area necessary for the safe visiting or viewing of classified land. An "incidental use" under (a) of this subsection may also include, but it is not limited to, a farm woodlot or a produce stand.(11) "Agrivoltaic facility" has the same meaning as described in RCW 43.21F.100.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 22. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:(1) For amounts received during the chapter 422, Laws of 2025 transition period, a person with a qualifying existing contract may elect to treat such amounts as gross income of the business subject to the tax under either RCW 82.04.250 or 82.04.290(2).(2) If a person with a qualifying existing contract makes no election under subsection (1) of this section during the transition period, amounts received from performing the services of that contract during the transition period are gross income of the business subject to the tax under RCW 82.04.250.(3) If a person either elects to treat amounts received under a qualifying existing contract as gross income of the business subject to the tax under RCW 82.04.250, gross income of the business subject to the tax under RCW 82.04.250(2), or both, the amounts are subject to the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW.(4) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Altered" means any of the following:(i) Materially or substantively changed;(ii) Amended; or(iii) Renewed;(b) "Qualifying existing contract" means a contract that meets all the following criteria:(i) The contract was signed and executed before October 1, 2025;(ii) The underlying services provided continued after October 1, 2025;(iii) The underlying services of that contract would be services defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050(3) (g) through (l) beginning October 1, 2025; and(iv) The contract was not altered during the transition period; and(c) "Transition period" and "chapter 422, Laws of 2025 transition period" mean the period of time beginning October 1, 2025, and ending on March 31, 2026.(5) This section expires July 1, 2031.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 23. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section, the department shall waive penalties otherwise due under this chapter if all of the following conditions are met:(a)(i) The penalties are imposed with respect to state and local sales taxes; and (ii) tax liability is a result of a failure to collect sales taxes on the additional select services subject to sales tax as provided in section 101, chapter 422, Laws of 2025 for tax reporting periods through December 31, 2026;(b) The taxpayer files with the department any amended or outstanding returns covering tax liabilities with respect to which a penalty waiver under this section is requested;(c) The taxpayer remits full payment to the department of the balance due on all tax liabilities for which a penalty waiver under this section is requested;(d) The taxpayer has timely filed returns and remitted payment on all taxes due for a period of 24 months immediately preceding the period covered by the return for which the waiver is being requested; and(e) The taxpayer must never have had an evasion penalty assessed against the taxpayer by the department under RCW 82.32.090 or a penalty assessed against the taxpayer by the department under RCW 82.32.291 for misusing a reseller permit or resale certificate.(2)(a) The taxpayer must submit a completed application for a penalty waiver under this section in a form and manner prescribed by the department.(b) Applications for a penalty waiver under this section must be submitted to the department on or before September 30, 2027.(3) The department must assess interest on unpaid tax liability for which a penalty waiver under this section is requested. The interest must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter.(4) All tax liability reported and paid as required in subsection (1) of this section is subject to verification by the department as provided in RCW 82.32.050. This section does not preclude the assessment of taxes, penalties, and interest with respect to any amounts determined by the department to have been underpaid for any tax period for which the taxpayer previously received penalty relief under this section.(5) This section does not apply to sales tax liabilities for tax reporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 2027.(6) This section expires January 1, 2029.Sec. 24. RCW 26.28.080 and 2019 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person who sells or gives, or permits to be sold or given, to any person under the age of ((twenty-one))21 years any cigar, cigarette, cigarette paper or wrapper, tobacco in any form, alternative nicotine product, or a vapor product is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.(2) It is not a defense to a prosecution for a violation of this section that the person acted, or was believed by the defendant to act, as agent or representative of another.(3) For the purposes of this section, (("vapor))the following definitions apply:(a) "Alternative nicotine product" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70.155.010.(b) "Vapor product" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70.345.010.Sec. 25. RCW 70.155.010 and 2019 c 15 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions set forth in RCW 82.24.010 apply to this chapter. In addition, for the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the context:(1) "Board" means the Washington state liquor and cannabis board.(2) "Internet" means any computer network, telephonic network, or other electronic network.(3) "Sample" means a tobacco product distributed to members of the general public at no cost or at nominal cost for product promotion purposes.(4) "Sampling" means the distribution of samples to members of the public.(5) "Tobacco product" means a product that contains tobacco and is intended for human use, including any product defined in RCW 82.24.010(2) or 82.26.010(21), except that for the purposes of RCW 70.155.140 only, "tobacco product" does not include ((cigars)):(a) Cigars defined in RCW 82.26.010 as to which ((one thousand))1,000 units weigh more than three pounds; or(b) Alternative nicotine products. For the purposes of this subsection (5), "alternative nicotine product" means any noncombustible product containing nicotine from any source that is intended for human consumption, whether chewed, absorbed, dissolved, inhaled, or ingested by any other means.(6) "Vapor product" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.345.010.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 26. RCW 82.04.29001 (Creation and distribution of custom softwareâCustomization of prewritten computer softwareâTaxable services) and 2003 c 168 s 602 & 1998 c 332 s 4 are each repealed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 27. Sections 2, 3, 4, 8, 10, 12 through 18, and 22 of this act apply both prospectively and retroactively to October 1, 2025.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 28. Sections 5 and 6 of this act apply both prospectively and retroactively to January 1, 2026.--- END ---